Oklahoma, session 2026, SB362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.1 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Community Health Worker Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.2 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in the Oklahoma Community Health Worker Act:


1. “Certified community health worker” means a community health


worker to whom the State Department of Health has issued a

Req. No. 1301 Page 1


certificate to practice as a certified community health worker in


this state;


2. “Community health worker” means a frontline public health


worker who has a shared understanding of and is a trusted member in


the community being served; and


3. “Department” means the State Department of Health.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.3 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall establish a certificate


for community health workers. This certification shall be


voluntary.


B. A certified community health worker may:


1. Serve as a liaison between health and social services and


the community to facilitate access to services and improve the


quality and cultural competence of service delivery;


2. Assist in identifying and communicating gaps in current


community and health care resources; and


3. Build individual and community capacity by increasing health


knowledge and self-sufficiency through a range of activities such as


outreach, community education, coaching, mentoring, social support,


and advocacy.





Req. No. 1301 Page 2


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.4 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules to:


1. Adopt a set of standards for the approval of certified


community health worker initial coursework or curriculum;


2. Establish examination administration requirements for the


State Department of Health or one or more designees;


3. Define minimum qualifications for applicants to be


certified; and


4. Establish the criteria for granting, denying, suspending,


and revoking a certificate to protect public health and safety.


B. The Commissioner may also promulgate rules necessary for the


proper administration and enforcement of the Oklahoma Community


Health Worker Act and which allow for reciprocity agreements


including, but not limited to, with the Indian Health Service,


Tribal Contract or Compact Health Centers, Urban Indian Health


Centers, and tribal health systems.


C. The Commissioner shall prescribe fees for the certified


community health worker examination, initial certification, and


certification renewal.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1301 DC 1/3/2025 5:10:08 PM

Req. No. 1301 Page 3